Utah statutes.
13-39-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Contact point" means an electronic identification to which a communication may be sent, including:

(a)  an email address; or

(b)  subject to Subsection 13-39-201(2):

(i)  an instant message identity, subject to rules made by the division under Subsection 13-39-203(1);

(ii)  a mobile or other telephone number;

(iii)  a facsimile number; or

(iv)  an electronic address:

(A)  similar to a contact point listed in this Subsection (1); and

(B)  defined as a contact point by rule made by the division under Subsection 13-39-203(1).

(2)  "Division" means the Division of Consumer Protection in the Department of Commerce.

(3)  "Registry" means the child protection registry established in Section 13-39-201.



Amended by Chapter 336, 2006 General Session

